Wyoming statutes. Title 37 Public Utilities
Article 1. In General

§ 37-5-101.
Wyoming pipeline authority. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 244, § 1; 1979, ch. 17, § 2; 1987, ch. 175, § 1; 2003, ch. 171, § 2; 2004, ch. 83, § 1; 2005, ch. 20, § 1; 2006, ch. 15, § 1; 2011, ch. 120, § 1; repealed by 2019 ch. 34, § 4, effective July 1, 2020.

§ 37-5-102.
Purposes; budget. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 244, § 1; 2003, ch. 171, § 2; 2004, ch. 83, § 1; 2011, ch. 120, § 1; repealed by 2019 ch. 34, § 4, effective July 1, 2020.

§ 37-5-103.
Powers of the authority. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 244, § 1; 1981, ch. 174, § 2; 2003, ch. 171, § 2; 2012, ch. 84, § 103; repealed by 2019 ch. 34, § 4, effective July 1, 2020.

§ 37-5-104.
Bonds. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 244, § 1; 2003, ch. 171, § 2; 2004, ch. 83, § 1; 2006, ch. 15, § 1; repealed by 2019 ch. 34, § 4, effective July 1, 2020.

§ 37-5-105.
Use of net revenues. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 244, § 1; 2003, ch. 171, § 2; repealed by 2019 ch. 34, Laws 2019, ch. 34, § 4, effective July 1, 2020.

§ 37-5-106.
Authority not subject to public service commission. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 244, § 1; repealed by 2019 ch. 34, Laws 2019, ch. 34, § 4, effective July 1, 2020.

§ 37-5-107.
Definitions. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 171, § 1; 2005, ch. 20, § 1; repealed by 2019 ch. 34, § 4, effective July 1, 2020.

§ 37-5-108.
Subpoena. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 171, § 1; repealed by 2019 ch. 34, Laws 2019, ch. 34, § 4, effective July 1, 2020.

§ 37-5-109.
Confidential information. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 171, § 1; repealed by 2019 ch. 34, Laws 2019, ch. 34, § 4, effective July 1, 2020.